dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX R   núť         núc        núť is:participle
SFX R   núť         ň          núť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   núť         ňme        núť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   núť         ňte        núť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   núť         nul        núť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   núť         nul        núť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   núť         nul        núť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   núť         nula       núť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   núť         nulo       núť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   núť         nuli       núť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   iezť        ežiem      riezť is:1st_person
SFX R   iezť        ežieš      riezť is:2nd_person
SFX R   iezť        ežie       riezť is:3rd_person
SFX R   iezť        ežieme     riezť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        ežiete     riezť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        ežú        riezť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        ežúc       riezť is:participle
SFX R   iezť        ež         riezť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iezť        ežme       riezť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezť        ežte       riezť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezť        eziem      [^r]iezť is:1st_person
SFX R   iezť        ezieš      [^r]iezť is:2nd_person
SFX R   iezť        ezie       [^r]iezť is:3rd_person
SFX R   iezť        ezieme     [^r]iezť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        eziete     [^r]iezť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        ezú        [^r]iezť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezť        ezúc       [^r]iezť is:participle
SFX R   iezť        ez         [^r]iezť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iezť        ezme       [^r]iezť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezť        ezte       [^r]iezť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ť           ol         [^r]iezť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^r]iezť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^r]iezť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ť           la         [^r]iezť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ť           lo         [^r]iezť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ť           li         [^r]iezť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^i]ezť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^i]ezť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^i]ezť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ť           la         [^i]ezť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ť           lo         [^i]ezť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ť           li         [^i]ezť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ť           iem        [^eý]zť is:1st_person
SFX R   ť           ieš        [^eý]zť is:2nd_person
SFX R   ť           ie         [^eý]zť is:3rd_person
SFX R   ť           ieme       [^eý]zť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ť           iete       [^eý]zť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ť           ú          [^eý]zť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ť           úc         [^eý]zť is:participle
SFX R   zť          z          [^eý]zť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ť           me         [^eý]zť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ť           te         [^eý]zť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ť           ol         [^e]zť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^e]zť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ť           ol         [^e]zť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ť           la         [^e]zť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ť           lo         [^e]zť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ť           li         [^e]zť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ýzť         yziem      ýzť is:1st_person
SFX R   ýzť         yzieš      ýzť is:2nd_person
SFX R   ýzť         yzie       ýzť is:3rd_person
SFX R   ýzť         yzieme     ýzť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ýzť         yziete     ýzť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ýzť         yzú        ýzť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ýzť         yzúc       ýzť is:participle
SFX R   ýzť         yz         ýzť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ýzť         yzme       ýzť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ýzť         yzte       ýzť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative

SFX b Y 8  # v testovaní: pred podst. mena vzoru dub s -u v G a -e L
SFX b   0           u          [klr] is:genitive
SFX b   0           om         [klr] is:dative
SFX b   0           y          [klr] is:nominative is:plural
SFX b   0           ov         [klr] is:genitive is:plural
SFX b   0           y          [klr] is:accusative is:plural
SFX b   0           och        [klr] is:locative is:plural
SFX b   0           om         [klr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX b   0           mi         [klr] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX n Y 15  # v testovaní: pre číslovky
SFX n   0           násobny    . po:adjective
SFX n   0           násobna    . po:adverb
SFX n   0           násobne    . po:adverb
SFX n   0           násobni    . po:verb is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX n   0           násobný    . po:adjective is:nominative
SFX n   0           násobná    . po:adjective is:nominative is:feminine
SFX n   0           násobné    . po:adjective is:nominative is:feminine is:plural
SFX n   0           násobné    . po:adjective is:nominative is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           násobní    . po:adjective is:nominative is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           násobných  . po:adjective is:genitive is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           násobných  . po:adjective is:genitive is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           násobných  . po:adjective is:accusative is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           násobné    . po:adjective is:accusative is:feminine is:plural
SFX n   0           násobné    . po:adjective is:accusative is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           násobnými  . po:adjective is:instrumental is:plural
