dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
balík/b po:noun is:masculine
brať/RN po:verb
cvendžať/RN po:verb
deväťdesiatšesť/n po:number
deväťstodeväťdesiatdeväťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstodeväťdesiattri/n po:number
deväťstodvadsaťpäťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstojedentisíc/n po:number
deväťstoosemdesiatšesťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstopäťdesiatjedentisíc/n po:number
deväťstopäťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstosedemdesiatšesťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstošesťdesiatjedentisíc/n po:number
deväťstošesťtisíc/n po:number
deväťstoštyridsaťsedemtisíc/n po:number
deväťstotridsaťjeden/n po:number
deväťstotrinásťtisíc/n po:number
dodrať/RN po:verb
dokričať/RN po:verb
doniesť/RN po:verb
dosviedčať/RN po:verb
dovravieť/RN po:verb
dučať/RN po:verb
dvadsaťkrát/n po:number
dvadsaťtisícdvesto/n po:number
dvestodeväť/n po:number
dvestodeväťdesiatštyri/n po:number
dvestodvadsaťosem/n po:number
dvestojeden/n po:number
dvestoosemdesiatpäťtisíc/n po:number
dvestopäťdesiatdeväťtisíc/n po:number
dvestopäťdesiattisíc/n po:number
dvestosedemdesiatpäť/n po:number
dvestošesťdesiatdeväť/n po:number
dvestošesťdesiattisíc/n po:number
dvestoštyridsaťosem/n po:number
dvestotridsať/n po:number
dvestotridsaťštyritisíc/n po:number
dvetisícšesťstotridsať/n po:number
expander/b po:noun is:masculine
fuňať/RN po:verb
hrmieť/RN po:verb
chrapšťať/RN po:verb
jojčať/RN po:verb
kultivátor/b po:noun is:masculine
kvočať/RN po:verb
mak/b po:noun is:masculine
maser/b po:noun is:masculine
mečať/RN po:verb
mlieť/RN po:verb
mručať/RN po:verb
nadletieť/RN po:verb
nahľadieť/RN po:verb
nakričať/RN po:verb
namrzieť/RN po:verb
napiecť/RN po:verb
napučať/RN po:verb
natriasť/RN po:verb
navravieť/RN po:verb
obdrať/RN po:verb
obidvoch/n po:number
objesť/RN po:verb
oborať/RN po:verb
obvinúť/RN po:verb
odjesť/RN po:verb
odmyslieť/RN po:verb
odpásť/RN po:verb
odsedieť/RN po:verb
odvanúť/RN po:verb
odvravieť/RN po:verb
omiesť/RN po:verb
opomenúť/RN po:verb
osemdesiatpäť/n po:number
osemstodeväť/n po:number
osemstodeväťdesiatštyri/n po:number
osemstodvadsaťosem/n po:number
osemstojeden/n po:number
osemstoosemdesiatsedem/n po:number
osemstopäťdesiatdva/n po:number
osemstopäťdesiattritisíc/n po:number
osemstosedemdesiatsedem/n po:number
osemstošesťdesiatdva/n po:number
osemstošesťdesiattritisíc/n po:number
osemstoštyridsaťpäť/n po:number
osemstotridsaťdeväťtisíc/n po:number
osemstotridsaťtri/n po:number
osinúť/RN po:verb
oval/b po:noun is:masculine
ovál/b po:noun is:masculine
panštieť/RN po:verb
päťdesiatosem/n po:number
päťstodesať/n po:number
päťstodeväťdesiatšesť/n po:number
päťstodvadsaťjeden/n po:number
päťstodvanásťtisíc/n po:number
päťstoosemdesiatpäť/n po:number
päťstopäťdesiatdeväť/n po:number
päťstopäťdesiattisíc/n po:number
päťstosedemdesiatpäť/n po:number
päťstošesťdesiatdeväť/n po:number
päťstošesťdesiattisíc/n po:number
päťstoštyridsaťosem/n po:number
päťstotridsať/n po:number
päťstotridsaťštyritisíc/n po:number
personál/b po:noun is:masculine
pľušťať/RN po:verb
podletieť/RN po:verb
podpliesť/RN po:verb
podsunúť/RN po:verb
pohorieť/RN po:verb
poležať/RN po:verb
polotvar/b po:noun is:masculine
pomôcť/RN po:verb
popršať/RN po:verb
pošťať/RN po:verb
povravieť/RN po:verb
prašťať/RN po:verb
predniesť/RN po:verb
predviesť/RN po:verb
prehrýzť/RN po:verb
preletieť/RN po:verb
premôcť/RN po:verb
prepásť/RN po:verb
presedieť/RN po:verb
pretriasť/RN po:verb
prevliecť/RN po:verb
pribrať/RN po:verb
priliezť/RN po:verb
priniesť/RN po:verb
pririecť/RN po:verb
priviesť/RN po:verb
pršať/RN po:verb
rinúť/RN po:verb
rozhrmieť/RN po:verb
rozjesť/RN po:verb
rozmlieť/RN po:verb
rozodrať/RN po:verb
rozpliesť/RN po:verb
rozrásť/RN po:verb
roztriasť/RN po:verb
rozvravieť/RN po:verb
sedemdesiatjeden/n po:number
sedemnásťtisíc/n po:number
sedemstodeväťdesiatsedem/n po:number
sedemstodvadsaťdva/n po:number
sedemstodvadsaťtritisíc/n po:number
sedemstoosemdesiatosem/n po:number
sedemstopäť/n po:number
sedemstopäťdesiatštyri/n po:number
sedemstosedemdesiatosem/n po:number
sedemstošesť/n po:number
sedemstošesťdesiatštyri/n po:number
sedemstoštyridsaťjeden/n po:number
sedemstotisíc/n po:number
sedemstotridsaťšesťtisíc/n po:number
sedieť/RN po:verb
skrvavieť/RN po:verb
spať/RN po:verb
spomenúť/RN po:verb
sršať/RN po:verb
stodeväťdesiatdeväťtisíc/n po:number
stodeväťdesiattri/n po:number
stodvadsaťpäťtisíc/n po:number
stojedentisíc/n po:number
stoosemdesiatšesťtisíc/n po:number
stopäťdesiatjedentisíc/n po:number
stopäťtisíc/n po:number
stosedemdesiatšesťtisíc/n po:number
stošesťdesiatjedentisíc/n po:number
stošesťtisíc/n po:number
stoštyridsaťsedemtisíc/n po:number
stotridsaťjeden/n po:number
stotrinásťtisíc/n po:number
strnúť/RN po:verb
svrbieť/RN po:verb
šesťdesiatšesť/n po:number
šesťstodeväťdesiatdva/n po:number
šesťstodeväťdesiattritisíc/n po:number
šesťstodvadsaťsedem/n po:number
šesťstoosem/n po:number
šesťstoosemdesiatštyri/n po:number
šesťstopäťdesiatosem/n po:number
šesťstosedem/n po:number
šesťstosedemdesiatštyri/n po:number
šesťstošesťdesiatosem/n po:number
šesťstoštyridsaťšesť/n po:number
šesťstotritisíc/n po:number
škripieť/RN po:verb
štyristodeväťdesiatdvatisíc/n po:number
štyristodvadsaťsedemtisíc/n po:number
štyristoosemdesiatštyritisíc/n po:number
štyristosedemdesiat/n po:number
štyristošesťdesiatosemtisíc/n po:number
štyristoštyridsaťšesťtisíc/n po:number
štyritisíc/n po:number
šušťať/RN po:verb
tester/b po:noun is:masculine
trčať/RN po:verb
tristodeväťdesiatjeden/n po:number
tristodvadsaťšesť/n po:number
tristoosemdesiattisíc/n po:number
tristosedemdesiatdeväť/n po:number
tristošesťdesiatpäť/n po:number
tristoštyridsaťštyri/n po:number
ubrať/RN po:verb
ujsť/RN po:verb
upliesť/RN po:verb
uspať/RN po:verb
utĺcť/RN po:verb
uzniesť/RN po:verb
vhrnúť/RN po:verb
visieť/RN po:verb
vniesť/RN po:verb
vrndžať/RN po:verb
vyhrmieť/RN po:verb
vyliezť/RN po:verb
vypliesť/RN po:verb
vyslyšať/RN po:verb
vyvinúť/RN po:verb
vzplanúť/RN po:verb
zadržať/RN po:verb
zahučať/RN po:verb
zajačať/RN po:verb
zamečať/RN po:verb
zaobliecť/RN po:verb
zarásť/RN po:verb
zasvišťať/RN po:verb
zatriasť/RN po:verb
zavrešťať/RN po:verb
zhrnúť/RN po:verb
zmlieť/RN po:verb
zorať/RN po:verb
zurčať/RN po:verb
